Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 54. Advanced Technology Initiative
[Repealed]

§§ 57-54-1 through 57-54-11.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1989, ch. 524, § 34, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§§57-54-1 and57-54-3. [Laws, 1984, ch. 381, §§ 1, 2]

§57-54-5. [Laws, 1984, ch. 381, § 3; Laws, 1985, ch. 457; Laws, 1986, ch. 376; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 66]

§57-54-7. [Laws, 1984, ch. 381, § 4]

§57-54-9. [Laws, 1984, ch. 381, § 5; Laws, 1987, ch. 411, § 2]

§57-54-11. [Laws, 1984, ch. 381, § 8]